zza/zza-Latn.aff
PFX W Y 79
PFX W 0 bi . 
PFX W 0 nê . 
PFX W 0 me . 
PFX W 0 anê .
PFX W 0 danê .
PFX W 0 denê .
PFX W 0 panê .
PFX W 0 ponê .
PFX W 0 ranê .
PFX W 0 ronê .
PFX W 0 tanê .
PFX W 0 tonê .
PFX W 0 wenê .
PFX W 0 pênê .
PFX W 0 nêa .
PFX W 0 nêda .
PFX W 0 nêde .
PFX W 0 nêpa .
PFX W 0 nêpo .
PFX W 0 nêra .
PFX W 0 nêro .
PFX W 0 nêta .
PFX W 0 nêto .
PFX W 0 nêwe .
PFX W 0 nêpê .
PFX W 0 a .
PFX W 0 da .
PFX W 0 de .
PFX W 0 pa .
PFX W 0 po .
PFX W 0 ra .
PFX W 0 ro .
PFX W 0 ta .
PFX W 0 to .
PFX W 0 we .
PFX W 0 mea .
PFX W 0 meda .
PFX W 0 mede .
PFX W 0 mepa .
PFX W 0 mepo .
PFX W 0 mera .
PFX W 0 mero .
PFX W 0 meta .
PFX W 0 meto .
PFX W 0 mewe .
PFX W 0 mepê .
PFX W 0 ame .
PFX W 0 dame .
PFX W 0 deme .
PFX W 0 pame .
PFX W 0 pome .
PFX W 0 rame .
PFX W 0 rome .
PFX W 0 tame .
PFX W 0 tome .
PFX W 0 weme .
PFX W 0 pême .
PFX W 0 bia .
PFX W 0 bida .
PFX W 0 bide .
PFX W 0 bipa .
PFX W 0 bipo .
PFX W 0 bira .
PFX W 0 biro .
PFX W 0 bita .
PFX W 0 bito .
PFX W 0 biwe .
PFX W 0 bipê .
PFX W 0 abi .
PFX W 0 dabi .
PFX W 0 debi .
PFX W 0 pabi .
PFX W 0 pobi .
PFX W 0 rabi .
PFX W 0 robi .
PFX W 0 tabi .
PFX W 0 tobi .
PFX W 0 webi .
PFX W 0 pêbi .
 

SFX W Y 5
SFX W 0 a .
SFX W 0 o .
SFX W 0 ê .
SFX W 0 e .
SFX W 0 î .



##########################################################################################
# END OF MORPHOLOGICAL RULES FOR NOUNS, VERBS, ADJECTIVES AND ADVERBS
##########################################################################################




############################### Numerals###################################################

# Number compounding rule allowing digit repetition

SFX E Y 19
SFX E 0 0 [0-9]
SFX E 0 in [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 ini [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 ina [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 inan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 ine [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 inê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 inî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 yin [aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 yina [aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 yinan [aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 yine [aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 yinê [aeêiîouû] .
SFX E 0 yinî [aeêiîouû] .
SFX E i îyin .
SFX E i îyina .
SFX E i îyinan .
SFX E i îyinê .
SFX E i îyinî .

############################ ADPOSITIONS' ‘EZAFE’#########################################



#SFX P Y 2
#SFX P 0 ê [^aeêiîouû] .
#SFX P 0 yê [aeêiîouû] .


############################ PRONOUN' ‘OBLIQE’############################################


SFX B Y 5
SFX B 0 i [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX B 0 î [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX B 0 e [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX B 0 an [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX B 0 anê [^aeêiîouû] .



############################ PUNCTUATION##################################################


#PFX H Y 1
#PFX H 0 1

#SFX H Y 1
#SFX H 0 1



############################ LOCATION ##################################################


#SFX J Y 4
#SFX J 0 ij [^aeêiîouû] sfx:-ij_attributive .
#SFX J 0 yij [aêîouû] sfx:-ij_attributive .
#SFX J e ij e sfx:-ij sfx:-ij_attributive .
#SFX J i ij i sfx:-ij sfx:-ij_attributive .


# END OF AFF FILE
# ========================================================================================
# Copyright 2025 Veysel YILDIZHAN <vyildizhan@outlook.com> and Sina Ahmadi <ahmadi.sina@outlook.com>
# ========================================================================================
