zza/zza-Latn.dic
0/E po:numeral
1/E po:numeral
10/E po:numeral
100/E po:numeral
1000/E po:numeral
1000000/E po:numeral
11/E po:numeral
12/E po:numeral
13/E po:numeral
14/E po:numeral
15/E po:numeral
16/E po:numeral
17/E po:numeral
18/E po:numeral
19/E po:numeral
2/E po:numeral
20/E po:numeral
3/E po:numeral
30/E po:numeral
4/E po:numeral
40/E po:numeral
5/E po:numeral
50/E po:numeral
6/E po:numeral
60/E po:numeral
7/E po:numeral
70/E po:numeral
8/E po:numeral
80/E po:numeral
9/E po:numeral
90/E po:numeral
awe/B po:pronoun
awî/B po:pronoun
aya/B po:pronoun
ayay/B po:pronoun
aye/B po:pronoun
ayi/B po:pronoun
ayo/B po:pronoun
ayê/B po:pronoun
ayî/B po:pronoun
cay/B po:pronoun
caye/B po:pronoun
cira/B po:pronoun
daye/B po:pronoun
dayê/B po:pronoun
des/E po:numeral
di/E po:numeral
diwês/E po:numeral
duyês/E po:numeral
ena/B po:pronoun
enay/B po:pronoun
eni/B po:pronoun
eno/B po:pronoun
enê/B po:pronoun
enî/B po:pronoun
enû/B po:pronoun
ewi/B po:pronoun
eyî/B po:pronoun
ez/B po:pronoun
heme/B po:pronoun
hemin/B po:pronoun
hemîn/B po:pronoun
hena/B po:pronoun
henî/B po:pronoun
hew/B po:pronoun
hewe/B po:pronoun
hewt/E po:numeral
hewtay/E po:numeral
hewtês/E po:numeral
hezar/E po:numeral
heşt/E po:numeral
heştay/E po:numeral
heştês/E po:numeral
hinî/B po:pronoun
hî/B po:pronoun
hînî/B po:pronoun
hîris/E po:numeral
hîrê/E po:numeral
hîrês/E po:numeral
ina/B po:pronoun
inay/B po:pronoun
iney/B po:pronoun
ini/B po:pronoun
ino/B po:pronoun
inê/B po:pronoun
inî/B po:pronoun
inû/B po:pronoun
ja/B po:pronoun
jê/B po:pronoun
kam/B po:pronoun
kes/B po:pronoun
ma/B po:pronoun
mi/B po:pronoun
mîlyon/E po:numeral
nae/B po:pronoun
nay/B po:pronoun
naye/B po:pronoun
nayi/B po:pronoun
new/E po:numeral
neway/E po:numeral
newês/E po:numeral
ney/B po:pronoun
no/B po:pronoun
nu/B po:pronoun
nî/B po:pronoun
nû/B po:pronoun
owi/B po:pronoun
panc/E po:numeral
pancas/E po:numeral
pancês/E po:numeral
qey/B po:pronoun
se/E po:numeral
sifir/E po:numeral
ti/B po:pronoun
tû/B po:pronoun
to/B po:pronoun
vîst/E po:numeral
wo/B po:pronoun
wu/B po:pronoun
wû/B po:pronoun
xo/B po:pronoun
ya/B po:pronoun
yay/B po:pronoun
yew/EMF po:numeral
yewbîn/B po:pronoun
yewendes/E po:numeral
yewî/B po:pronoun
yey/B po:pronoun
yi/B po:pronoun
yê/B po:pronoun
yî/B po:pronoun
yû/B po:pronoun
çar/E po:numeral
çarês/E po:numeral
çend/B po:pronoun
çewres/E po:numeral
çi/B po:pronoun
çiqas/B po:pronoun
ê/B po:pronoun
êne/B po:pronoun
êy/B po:pronoun
êyî/B po:pronoun
înan/B po:pronoun
îne/B po:pronoun
îz/B po:pronoun
şeş/E po:numeral
şeştî/E po:numeral
şima/B po:pronoun
şîyês/E po:numeral
a/W po:verb  is:present_copula_1sg st:a  lem:bîyayene 
a/W po:verb  is:present_copula_2sg_F st:a  lem:bîyayene 
a/W po:verb  is:present_copula_3sg_F st:a  lem:bîyayene 
bê/W po:verb is:come_imp_2sg st:bê lem:ameyene 
bêrê/W po:verb is:come_imp_2pl st:bê lem:ameyene 
bi/W po:verb is:past_copula_3sg_M st:bi lem:bîyayene 
bî/W po:verb is:past_copula_3sg_F st:bî lem:bîyayene 
bîya/W po:verb is:past_copula_1sg st:bîya lem:bîyayene 
bîya/W po:verb is:past_copula_2sg_F st:bîya lem:bîyayene 
bîya/W po:verb is:past_copula_3sg_F st:bîya lem:bîyayene 
bîyê/W po:verb is:past_copula_123pl st:bîyê lem:bîyayene 
bîyî/W po:verb is:past_copula_2sg_M st:bîyî lem:bîyayene 
bîyo/W po:verb is:past_copula_3sg_M st:bîyo lem:bîyayene 
çin/W po:verb is:negative_have st:çin lem:çinbîyayene 
ê/W po:verb is:present_copula_123pl st:ê lem:bîyayene 
esta/W po:verb is:have_present_1sg st:est lem:estbîyayene 
esta/W po:verb is:have_present_2sg_F st:est lem:estbîyayene 
esta/W po:verb is:have_present_3sg_F st:est lem:estbîyayene 
estbî/W po:verb is:have_past_123pl st:estbî lem:estbîyayene 
estbî/W po:verb is:have_past_1sg st:estbî lem:estbîyayene 
estbî/W po:verb is:have_past_2sg_F st:estbî lem:estbîyayene 
estbî/W po:verb is:have_past_2sg_M st:estbî lem:estbîyayene 
estbî/W po:verb is:have_past_3sg_F st:estbî lem:estbîyayene 
estbî/W po:verb is:have_past_3sg_M st:estbî lem:estbîyayene 
estê/W po:verb is:have_present_123pl st:est lem:estbîyayene 
estî/W po:verb is:have_present_2sg_M st:est lem:estbîyayene 
esto/W po:verb is:have_present_3sg_M st:est lem:estbîyayene 
î/W po:verb is:present_copula_2sg_M st:î lem:bîyayene 
mê/W po:verb is:negative_come_imp_2sg st:bê lem:ameyene 
mêrê/W po:verb is:negative_come_imp_2pl st:bê lem:ameyene 
nîyê/W po:verb is:negative_present_copula_123pl st:ê lem:bîyayene 
nîme/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_1pl st:ye lem:ameyene 
nîna/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_1sg st:ye lem:ameyene 
nîna/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_2sg_F st:ye lem:ameyene 
nîna/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_3sg_F st:ye lem:ameyene 
nînê/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_123pl st:ye lem:ameyene 
nînî/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_2sg_M st:ye lem:ameyene 
nînîme/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_1pl st:ye lem:ameyene 
nîno/W po:verb is:negative_come_present_3sg_M st:ye lem:ameyene 
nîya/W po:verb is:negative_present_copula_1sg st:a lem:bîyayene 
nîya/W po:verb is:negative_present_copula_2sg_F st:a lem:bîyayene 
nîya/W po:verb is:negative_present_copula_3sg_F st:a lem:bîyayene 
nîyî/W po:verb is:negative_present_copula_2sg_M st:î lem:bîyayene 
nîyo/W po:verb is:negative_present_copula_3sg_M st:o lem:bîyayene 
o/W po:verb is:present_copula_3sg_M st:o lem:bîyayene 
şêrê/W po:verb is:come_imp_2sg st:şo lem:şîyayene 
şo/W po:verb is:come_imp_2pl st:şo lem:şîyayene 
ya/W po:verb is:present_copula_1sg st:ya lem:bîyayene 
ya/W po:verb is:present_copula_2sg_F st:ya lem:bîyayene 
ya/W po:verb is:present_copula_3sg_F st:ya lem:bîyayene 
yê/W po:verb is:present_copula_123pl st:yê lem:bîyayene 
yeme/W po:verb is:come_present_1pl st:ye lem:ameyene 
yena/W po:verb is:come_present_1sg st:ye lem:ameyene 
yena/W po:verb is:come_present_2sg_F st:ye lem:ameyene 
yena/W po:verb is:come_present_3sg_F st:ye lem:ameyene 
yenê/W po:verb is:come_present_123pl st:ye lem:ameyene 
yenî/W po:verb is:come_present_2sg_M st:ye lem:ameyene 
yenîme/W po:verb is:come_present_1pl st:ye lem:ameyene 
yeno/W po:verb is:come_present_3sg_M st:ye lem:ameyene 
yî/W po:verb is:present_copula_2sg_M st:yî lem:bîyayene 
yo/W po:verb is:present_copula_3sg_M st:yo lem:bîyayene 
ci/B po:pronoun
